Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.440

Certain agreement to transfer and transfers of ownership in rights or securities prohibited.

Prior to completion of a conversion, no person may transfer or enter into any agreement or understanding to transfer the legal or beneficial ownership of conversion subscription rights, or the underlying securities, to the account of another.

[ 1981 c 85 s 87.]